ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.aff
# rule/flag 40 (affects 20392 words, has 1499 subrules):
flag f:
	U G A	>	-GA,ID
	U G A	>	-GA,IKS
	U G A	>	-GA,IL
	U G A	>	-GA,ILE
	U G A	>	-GA,ILT
	U G A	>	-GA,IS
	U G A	>	-GA,ISSE
	U G A	>	-GA,IST
	A G A	>	-GA,KS
	A G A	>	-GA,LE
	A G A	>	-GA,NA
	A G A	>	-GA,NI
	I G A	>	-GA,SID
	I G A	>	-GA,SIDKI
	A G A	>	-GA,TA
	E G A	>	-GA,TEGAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,TEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,TEKSKI
	E G A	>	-GA,TELEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,TELGI
	E G A	>	-GA,TELTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,TENAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,TENIGI
	E G A	>	-GA,TESKI
	E G A	>	-GA,TESSEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,TESTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,TETAGI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,A
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AB
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,ABKI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AD
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,ADKI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AGI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AKS
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AKSID
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AKSIDKI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AKSIME
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AKSIMEGI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AKSIN
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AKSINGI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AKSITE
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AKSITEGI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AKSKI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AME
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AMEGI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AN
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,ANGI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,ATE
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,ATEGI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AVAD
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,AVADKI
	[EIU] N U D	>	-NUD,DA
	[EIU] N U D	>	-NUD,DAGI
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,DAKSE
	[NR] N U D	>	-NUD,DAKSEGI
	[ENRU] N U D	>	-NUD,DES
	[ENRU] N U D	>	-NUD,DESKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAD
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJADKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAGA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAGAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAID
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAIDKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAIGA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAIGAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAIKS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAIKSKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAIL
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAILE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAILEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAILGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAILT
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAILTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAINA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAINAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAINI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAINIGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAIS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAISKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAISSE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAISSEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAIST
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAISTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAITA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAITAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAKS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAKSKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAL
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJALE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJALEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJALGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJALT
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJALTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJANA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJANAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJANI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJANIGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJASKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJASSE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJASSEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAST
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJASTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJAT
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATEGA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATEGAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATEKS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATEKSKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATEL
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATELE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATELEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATELGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATELT
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATELTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATENA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATENAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATENI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATENIGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATES
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATESKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATESSE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATESSEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATEST
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATESTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATETA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATETAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EJATKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMAKS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMAKSKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMAS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMASKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMAST
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMASTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATU
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUD
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUDKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUGA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUGAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUID
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUIDKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUIGA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUIGAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUIKS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUIKSKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUIL
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUILE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUILEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUILGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUILT
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUILTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUINA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUINAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUINI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUINIGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUIS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUISKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUISSE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUISSEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUIST
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUISTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUITA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUITAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUKS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUKSKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUL
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATULE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATULEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATULGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATULT
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATULTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUNA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUNAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUNI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUNIGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUSKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUSSE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUSSEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUST
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUSTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUT
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTEGA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTEGAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTEKS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTEKSKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTEL
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTELE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTELEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTELGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTELT
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTELTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTENA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTENAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTENI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTENIGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTES
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTESKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTESSE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTESSEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTEST
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTESTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTETA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTETAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMATUTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMINE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMINEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISED
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISEDKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISEGA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISEGAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISEKS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISEKSKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISEL
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISELE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISELEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISELGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISELT
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISELTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISENA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISENAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISENI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISENIGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISES
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISESKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISESSE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISESSEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISEST
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISESTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISETA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISETAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISIGA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISIGAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISIGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISIKS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISIKSKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISIL
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISILE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISILEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISILGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISILT
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISILTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISINA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISINAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISINI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISINIGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISIS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISISKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISISSE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISISSEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISIST
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISISTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISITA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISITAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISSE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISSEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMIST
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTEGA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTEGAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTEKS
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTEKSKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTEL
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTELE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTELEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTELGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTELT
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTELTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTENA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTENAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTENI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTENIGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTES
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTESKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTESSE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTESSEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTEST
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTESTKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTETA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTETAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,EMISTKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAGU
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAGUGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAKS
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAKSE
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAKSEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAKSKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATU
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUD
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUDKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUGA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUGAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUID
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUIDKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUIGA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUIGAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUIKS
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUIKSKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUIL
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUILE
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUILEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUILGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUILT
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ETAMATUILTKI
