ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.dict
aferistiga/acefijkly
aksiomaatikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
alusetuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
anglomaaniaga/abcdefgikmnoy
arabeskiga/acefijkly
asfaldituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
auspiitsiga/acefijkly
baskiga/acefijkly
bonapartistiga/acefijkly
definiitsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
detektiiviga/acefijkly
distsiplineerimatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
ebeldanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ekspansiivsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
embrüoloogiga/acefijkly
erotomaaniga/acefijkly
faktooriaga/abcdefgikmnoy
firmaga/abcdfghiky
frigiidsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
genitiiviga/acefijkly
grüpsiga/acefijkly
hallistunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hautamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
hepikuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
hoidmatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
hullimaga/abcdefgkmnoy
hääbuvaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
hüperboloidsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
ikebanaga/abcdfghiky
individuaaliga/acefijkly
intensiivsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
itaallannaga/abcdfghiky
joodiga/acefijkly
juudaga/abcefiknxy
jõratanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kadrilliga/acefijkly
kalduvaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
kanonaadiga/acefijkly
karikjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
katarriga/acefijkly
kehatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
ketğuaga/abcdefgikmnoy
kiitlevaga/abcdefgkmnoy
kirjanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kleepjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
koeremaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
kolksunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
komplekteerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
konstateeringuga/abcdefgikmoy
koormanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kortsutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
krepdeğiiniga/acefijkly
kruttinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kulgenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kurvemaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
kähmlematuga/abcdefgkmoy
käuksunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kõmminud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
körtsikuga/abcdefgikmoy
küürunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lahutamatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
lapitavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
leegitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
leopardiga/acefijkly
liigutuga/abcdefgijklmnoy
lirumaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
lokkavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
lubamatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
läidetamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
lõikmega/abcefhiklmny
lühistunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mahutamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
marasmiga/acefijkly
meelikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
metissiga/acefijkly
moiraga/abcdfghiky
muiatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
muundunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mõjuvaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
müokardiga/acefijkly
najatunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
nentinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
nokjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
nurgikuga/abcdefgikmoy
näppavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
nööbituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
okeanoloogiga/acefijkly
organiseerimatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
paatkonnaga/abcfiky
palakaga/abcdefgikmnoy
paradokslevaga/abcdefgkmnoy
patenditavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
pekitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
pihitavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
pilotkaga/abcdfghiky
planeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
poegkonnaga/abcfiky
popeliiniga/acefijkly
preeriaga/abcdefgikmnoy
promovendiga/acefijkly
publitsistiga/acefijkly
punktsiooniga/acefijkly
päntsakaga/abcdefgikmnoy
põmmutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
püstakaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
raiskunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
raugematuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
rekursiooniga/acefijkly
reumaatikuga/abcdefgikmoy
riputavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
roomikuga/abcdefgikmoy
rägastunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
röginaga/abcdefgikmnoy
saatjaskonnaga/abcfiky
samimaga/abcdefgkmnoy
sedastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
semiootikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
signum-funktsiooniga/acefijkly
sirgestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sobranud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
soonkonnaga/abcfiky
sporditavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
subjektivismiga/acefijkly
sumistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
säilikuga/abcdefgikmoy
sõtkaga/abcefiknxy
süsijaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
taimikuga/abcdefgikmoy
taplejaga/abcdefgkmnoy
tehnokraatiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
terroristiga/acefijkly
timbitavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
tolmutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
traadituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
triooliga/acefijkly
tsunftiga/acefijkly
tumbaga/abcdfghiky
tuupinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tõendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
töötajaskonnaga/abcfiky
uhklevaga/abcdefgkmnoy
uralistiga/acefijkly
vabrikuga/abcdefgikmoy
valgekaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
varbitavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
veetustanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vigastunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vilgutamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
vormikaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
välklevaga/abcdefgkmnoy
võimetuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
ğovinismiga/acefijkly
şurnalistiga/acefijkly
